idioms/surmiran-override.lexc
! -*- coding: utf-8 -*-
! University of Zurich - Institute of Computational Linguistics
! Morphology anlysis for Romansh: Frequent words with different forms in Surmiran
! Author: Reto Baumgartner
! Date: June 2013


Multichar_Symbols +Art +Def +Indef ^= ^| +Prep
+Pron +Pers +Refl +Poss +Dem +Interrog
^DB +Noun +Nom +AccDat +Acc
+Masc +Fem +MF +1P +2P +3P +Sg +Pl
+Apo +Ton +Aton +Conj +Subj +Verb +PresInd
@U.FLEX.MSg@ @U.FLEX.FSg@ @U.FLEX.MPl@ @U.FLEX.FPl@

LEXICON Root
DEFINITE ;
INDEFINITEA ;
DEFINITEWITHPREP ;
PERSONAL ;
POSSESSIVE ;
DEMONSTRATIVE ;
INTERROGATIVE ;
INDEFINITE ;
OTHERFORMS ;

! articles
LEXICON DEFINITE
il+Art+Def+Masc+Sg:igl	#;
il+Art+Def+Masc+Pl:igls	#;

LEXICON INDEFINITEA
in+Art+Indef+Masc+Sg:en	#;
in+Art+Indef+Fem+Sg:ena	#;
in+Art+Indef+Fem+Sg+Apo:en'	#;

LEXICON DEFINITEWITHPREP
! not contracted: sen + la; per
da+Prep^=+Art+Def+Masc+Sg:digl	#;
da+Prep^=+Art+Def+Masc+Sg:digls	#;
da+Prep^=+Art+Def+Fem+Sg:dalla	#;
da+Prep^=+Art+Def+Fem+Pl:dallas	#;

! TODO: Forms to check: agl, agls
! a+Prep^=+Art+Def+Masc+Sg:agl	#;
! a+Prep^=+Art+Def+Masc+Sg:agls	#;
a+Prep^=+Art+Def+Fem+Sg:alla	#;
a+Prep^=+Art+Def+Fem+Pl:allas	#;

cun+Prep^=+Art+Def+Masc+Sg:cugl	#;
cun+Prep^=+Art+Def+Masc+Sg:cugls	#;
cun+Prep^=+Art+Def+Fem+Sg:culla	#;
cun+Prep^=+Art+Def+Fem+Pl:cullas	#;

sin+Prep^=+Art+Def+Masc+Sg:segl	#;
sin+Prep^=+Art+Def+Masc+Sg:segls	#;

! TODO: Forms to check: agl, agls
! en+Prep^=+Art+Def+Masc+Sg:agl	#;
! en+Prep^=+Art+Def+Masc+Sg:agls	#;


! pronouns
LEXICON PERSONAL
! jau
jau+Pron+Pers+Nom+1P+MF+Sg:ia	#;
! ti
ti+Pron+Pers+Nom+2P+MF+Sg:te	#;



LEXICON POSSESSIVE
! jau
mes+Pron+Poss+Masc+Sg:mies	#;
mes+Pron+Poss+Masc+Pl:mies	#;
mes+Pron+Poss^DB+Noun+Masc+Pl:mies	#;
! ti
tes+Pron+Poss+Masc+Sg:ties	#;
tes+Pron+Poss+Masc+Pl:ties	#;
tes+Pron+Poss^DB+Noun+Masc+Pl:ties	#;
! el, ella
ses+Pron+Poss+Masc+Sg:sies	#;
ses+Pron+Poss+Masc+Pl:sies	#;
ses+Pron+Poss^DB+Noun+Masc+Pl:sies	#;



LEXICON DEMONSTRATIVE
quai+Pron+Dem:chegl	#;
quest+Pron+Dem:chest	REGULAR;



LEXICON INTERROGATIVE
tge+Pron+Interrog:tge	#;
tgenin+Pron+Interrog:tgenin	REGULAR;
tgi+Pron+Interrog:tgi	#;



LEXICON INDEFINITE
inqual+Pron+Indef:enqual	REGULAR;
insaqual+Pron+Indef:ensaqual	REGULAR;
insaquants+Pron+Indef:ensaquant	REGULARPLURAL;
insatge+Pron+Indef:ensatge	#;
insatgi+Pron+Indef:ensatgi	#;
tut+Pron+Indef+Masc+Sg:tot		#;
tut+Pron+Indef+Masc+Pl:tots	#;
tut+Pron+Indef+Fem+Sg:totta	#;
tut+Pron+Indef+Fem+Pl:tottas	#;



!! Endings:
LEXICON REGULAR
+Masc+Sg:0	#;
+Masc+Pl:s	#;
+Fem+Sg:a	#;
+Fem+Pl:as	#;

LEXICON REGULARSINGULAR
+Masc+Sg:0	#;
+Fem+Sg:a	#;

LEXICON REGULARPLURAL
+Masc+Pl:s	#;
+Fem+Pl:as	#;

LEXICON OTHERFORMS
! verbs
avair+Verb+PresInd+3P+Sg:ò	#;
esser+Verb+PresInd+2P+Sg:ist	#;
! preposition
sin+Prep:sen	#;
en+Prep:an	#;
